Tennessee, session 114, HB1928.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-221-407, is amended by deleting
the section and substituting:
(a) The commissioner shall not approve a proposed subdivision until the plans
for such subdivision have been approved by a local planning commission or other
agency authorized to approve subdivisions.
(b) The department shall update its website to allow persons whose proposed
subdivision plans have been approved by a local planning commission or other agency
authorized to approve subdivisions to upload official documentation from such local
entities to evidence their approval of such plans.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it, and
applies to all permit applications approved by local planning commissions or other agencies
authorized to approve subdivision plans after such date.
HB1928
011074
- 1 -